North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-14.2 Northern Crops Institute [Repealed]

4-14.2-01.
Northern crops institute — Establishment — Director. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 94, § 1; 1993, ch. 56, § 1; 1995, ch. 62, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.2-02.
Northern crops council — Duties — Chairman — Meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 94, § 2; 1983, ch. 95, § 1; 1989, ch. 76, § 7; 1991, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 56, § 2; 2007, ch. 61, § 1; 2011, ch. 19, § 9; 2015, ch. 65, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.2-03.
Purpose — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 94, § 3; 1991, ch. 67, § 2; 2003, ch. 138, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.2-04.
Gifts and grants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 94, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.